dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Fk Y 62
SFX Fk ти л .
SFX Fk ти ла .
SFX Fk ти ло .
SFX Fk ти ли .
SFX Fk ути ову .
SFX Fk ути овем .
SFX Fk ути овеш .
SFX Fk ути ове .
SFX Fk ути овемо .
SFX Fk ути овете .
SFX Fk ути овут .
SFX Fk ти х .
SFX Fk ти ше .
SFX Fk ти хмо .
SFX Fk ти сте .
SFX Fk ти ху .
SFX Fk ути ови .
SFX Fk ути овимо .
SFX Fk ути овите .
SFX Fk ути овучи .
SFX Fk ути овучего .
SFX Fk ути овучему .
SFX Fk ути овучим .
SFX Fk ути овучем .
SFX Fk ути овучих .
SFX Fk ути овучими .
SFX Fk ути овуча .
SFX Fk ути овучу .
SFX Fk ути овучеј .
SFX Fk ути овучеју .
SFX Fk ути овуче .
SFX Fk ути овемы .
SFX Fk ути овемого .
SFX Fk ути овемому .
SFX Fk ути овемым .
SFX Fk ути овемом .
SFX Fk ути овемо .
SFX Fk ути овема .
SFX Fk ути овему .
SFX Fk ути овемој .
SFX Fk ути овемоју .
SFX Fk ути овеми .
SFX Fk ути овеме .
SFX Fk ути овемых .
SFX Fk ути овемым .
SFX Fk ути овемыми .
SFX Fk ти вши .
SFX Fk ти вшего .
SFX Fk ти вшему .
SFX Fk ти вшим .
SFX Fk ти вшем .
SFX Fk ти вших .
SFX Fk ти вшими .
SFX Fk ти вша .
SFX Fk ти вшу .
SFX Fk ти вшеј .
SFX Fk ти вшеју .
SFX Fk ти вше .
SFX Fk и ы .
SFX Fk и а .
SFX Fk и о .
SFX Fk и је .

SFX Fl Y 21
SFX Fl 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Fl от т/xPxE .
SFX Fl от ты/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 ы/xPxE .
SFX Fl от та/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Fl от тов/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX Fl от ту/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Fl от тах/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Fl от там/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Fl от том/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Fl от тами/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Fl от те/xPxE .
SFX Fl 0 е/xPxE .

SFX Fm Y 11
SFX Fm 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fm 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Fm ен ни/xPxE .
SFX Fm ен на/xPxE .
SFX Fm ен нов/xPxE .
SFX Fm ен ну/xPxE .
SFX Fm ен нах/xPxE .
SFX Fm ен нам/xPxE .
SFX Fm ен ном/xPxE .
SFX Fm ен нами/xPxE .
SFX Fm ен не/xPxE .

SFX Fn Y 11
SFX Fn 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fn 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Fn ыр ир/xPxE .
SFX Fn ыр ире/xPxE .
SFX Fn ыр ира/xPxE .
SFX Fn ыр ирев/xPxE .
SFX Fn ыр иру/xPxE .
SFX Fn ыр ирах/xPxE .
SFX Fn ыр ирам/xPxE .
SFX Fn ыр ирем/xPxE .
SFX Fn ыр ирами/xPxE .

SFX Fo Y 62
SFX Fo ти л .
SFX Fo ти ла .
SFX Fo ти ло .
SFX Fo ти ли .
SFX Fo рати ору .
SFX Fo рати орем .
SFX Fo рати ореш .
SFX Fo рати оре .
SFX Fo рати оремо .
SFX Fo рати орете .
SFX Fo рати орут .
SFX Fo ти х .
SFX Fo ти ше .
SFX Fo ти хмо .
SFX Fo ти сте .
SFX Fo ти ху .
SFX Fo рати ори .
SFX Fo рати оримо .
SFX Fo рати орите .
SFX Fo рати оручи .
SFX Fo рати оручего .
SFX Fo рати оручему .
SFX Fo рати оручим .
SFX Fo рати оручем .
SFX Fo рати оручих .
SFX Fo рати оручими .
SFX Fo рати оруча .
SFX Fo рати оручу .
SFX Fo рати оручеј .
SFX Fo рати оручеју .
SFX Fo рати оруче .
SFX Fo рати оремы .
SFX Fo рати оремого .
SFX Fo рати оремому .
SFX Fo рати оремым .
SFX Fo рати оремом .
SFX Fo рати оремо .
SFX Fo рати орема .
SFX Fo рати орему .
SFX Fo рати оремој .
SFX Fo рати оремоју .
SFX Fo рати ореми .
SFX Fo рати ореме .
SFX Fo рати оремых .
SFX Fo рати оремым .
SFX Fo рати оремыми .
SFX Fo ти вши .
SFX Fo ти вшего .
SFX Fo ти вшему .
SFX Fo ти вшим .
SFX Fo ти вшем .
SFX Fo ти вших .
SFX Fo ти вшими .
SFX Fo ти вша .
SFX Fo ти вшу .
SFX Fo ти вшеј .
SFX Fo ти вшеју .
SFX Fo ти вше .
SFX Fo и ы .
SFX Fo и а .
SFX Fo и о .
SFX Fo и је .

SFX Fp Y 21
SFX Fp 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Fp ор р/xPxE .
SFX Fp ор ры/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ы/xPxE .
SFX Fp ор ра/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Fp ор ров/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ов/xPxE .
SFX Fp ор ру/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Fp ор рах/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Fp ор рам/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Fp ор ром/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ом/xPxE .
SFX Fp ор рами/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Fp ор ре/xPxE .
SFX Fp 0 е/xPxE .

SFX Fq Y 81
SFX Fq ти л .
SFX Fq ти ла .
SFX Fq ти ло .
SFX Fq ти ли .
SFX Fq ати у .
SFX Fq ати ем .
SFX Fq ати еш .
SFX Fq ати е .
SFX Fq ати емо .
SFX Fq ати ете .
SFX Fq ати ут .
SFX Fq ти х .
SFX Fq ти ше .
SFX Fq ти хмо .
SFX Fq ти сте .
SFX Fq ти ху .
SFX Fq ати и .
SFX Fq ати имо .
SFX Fq ати ите .
SFX Fq ати учи .
SFX Fq ати учего .
SFX Fq ати учему .
SFX Fq ати учим .
SFX Fq ати учем .
SFX Fq ати учих .
SFX Fq ати учими .
SFX Fq ати уча .
SFX Fq ати учу .
SFX Fq ати учеј .
SFX Fq ати учеју .
SFX Fq ати уче .
SFX Fq ати омы .
SFX Fq ати омого .
SFX Fq ати омому .
SFX Fq ати омым .
SFX Fq ати омом .
SFX Fq ати омо .
SFX Fq ати ома .
SFX Fq ати ому .
SFX Fq ати омој .
SFX Fq ати омоју .
SFX Fq ати оми .
SFX Fq ати оме .
SFX Fq ати омых .
SFX Fq ати омым .
SFX Fq ати омыми .
SFX Fq ати омо .
SFX Fq ти вши .
SFX Fq ти вшего .
SFX Fq ти вшему .
SFX Fq ти вшим .
SFX Fq ти вшем .
SFX Fq ти вших .
SFX Fq ти вшими .
SFX Fq ти вша .
SFX Fq ти вшу .
SFX Fq ти вшеј .
SFX Fq ти вшеју .
SFX Fq ти вше .
SFX Fq ти ны .
SFX Fq ти ного .
SFX Fq ти ному .
SFX Fq ти ным .
SFX Fq ти ном .
SFX Fq ти ни .
SFX Fq ти не .
SFX Fq ти ных .
SFX Fq ти ными .
SFX Fq ти на .
SFX Fq ти ну .
SFX Fq ти ној .
SFX Fq ти ноју .
SFX Fq ти но .
SFX Fq ти нје/xPxE .
SFX Fq ти нја/xPxE .
SFX Fq ти нју/xPxE .
SFX Fq ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX Fq ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX Fq ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX Fq ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX Fq ти нјах/xPxE .

SFX Fr Y 80
SFX Fr ти л .
SFX Fr ти ла .
SFX Fr ти ло .
SFX Fr ти ли .
SFX Fr лати елју .
SFX Fr лати елјем .
SFX Fr лати елјеш .
SFX Fr лати елје .
SFX Fr лати елјемо .
SFX Fr лати елјете .
SFX Fr лати елјут .
SFX Fr ти х .
SFX Fr ти ше .
SFX Fr ти хмо .
SFX Fr ти сте .
SFX Fr ти ху .
SFX Fr лати елј .
SFX Fr лати елјмо .
SFX Fr лати елјте .
SFX Fr лати елјучи .
SFX Fr лати елјучего .
SFX Fr лати елјучему .
SFX Fr лати елјучим .
SFX Fr лати елјучем .
SFX Fr лати елјучих .
SFX Fr лати елјучими .
SFX Fr лати елјуча .
SFX Fr лати елјучу .
SFX Fr лати елјучеј .
SFX Fr лати елјучеју .
SFX Fr лати елјуче .
SFX Fr лати елјемы .
SFX Fr лати елјемого .
SFX Fr лати елјемому .
SFX Fr лати елјемым .
SFX Fr лати елјемом .
SFX Fr лати елјемо .
SFX Fr лати елјема .
SFX Fr лати елјему .
SFX Fr лати елјемој .
SFX Fr лати елјемоју .
SFX Fr лати елјеми .
SFX Fr лати елјеме .
SFX Fr лати елјемых .
SFX Fr лати елјемым .
SFX Fr лати елјемыми .
SFX Fr ти вши .
SFX Fr ти вшего .
SFX Fr ти вшему .
SFX Fr ти вшим .
SFX Fr ти вшем .
SFX Fr ти вших .
SFX Fr ти вшими .
SFX Fr ти вша .
SFX Fr ти вшу .
SFX Fr ти вшеј .
SFX Fr ти вшеју .
SFX Fr ти вше .
SFX Fr ти ны .
SFX Fr ти ного .
SFX Fr ти ному .
SFX Fr ти ным .
SFX Fr ти ном .
SFX Fr ти ни .
SFX Fr ти не .
SFX Fr ти ных .
SFX Fr ти ными .
SFX Fr ти на .
SFX Fr ти ну .
SFX Fr ти ној .
SFX Fr ти ноју .
SFX Fr ти но .
SFX Fr ти нје/xPxE .
SFX Fr ти нја/xPxE .
SFX Fr ти нју/xPxE .
SFX Fr ти нјем/xPxE .
SFX Fr ти ниј/xPxE .
SFX Fr ти нјам/xPxE .
SFX Fr ти нјами/xPxE .
SFX Fr ти нјах/xPxE .
