dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.dic
оплути/Fk
осот/Fl
овен/Fm
панцыр/Fn
разпрати/Fo
вихор/Fp
обрастати/Fq
стлати/Fr
постлати/Fr
разстлати/Fr
прати/Fo
изплути/Fk
одплути/Fk
поплути/Fk
прєплути/Fk
приплути/Fk
плути/Fk
